src/fst/morphology/ext-github_kristiank/data/giellatekno/gt-norm-yamls/N-paive_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - päive :   # should decline like the paradigm 'asPäive'
    päive+N+Sg+Nom: päive
    päive+N+Pl+Nom: päiväd
    päive+N+Sg+Gen: päivä
    päive+N+Pl+Gen: [päivi, päivije]
    päive+N+Sg+Par: [päivä, päivää]
    päive+N+Pl+Par: [päivi, päivii]
    päive+N+Sg+Ill: [päivää, päiväse]
    päive+N+Pl+Ill: [päivi, päivise]
    päive+N+Sg+Ine: päiväz
    päive+N+Pl+Ine: päiviz
    päive+N+Sg+Ela: päivässä
    päive+N+Pl+Ela: päivissä
    päive+N+Sg+All: päivällä
    päive+N+Pl+All: päiville
    päive+N+Sg+Ade: päiväl
    päive+N+Pl+Ade: päivil
    päive+N+Sg+Abl: päivälte
    päive+N+Pl+Abl: päivilte
    päive+N+Sg+Tra: päivässi
    päive+N+Pl+Tra: päivissi
    päive+N+Sg+Ter: päivässaa
    päive+N+Pl+Ter: päivissaa
    päive+N+Sg+Com: päiväka
    päive+N+Pl+Com: päivika
